California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
If, at the close of the hearing, the board of supervisors determines to annex the territory, or any portion thereof, it shall so declare by resolution. The annexation shall be effective upon the date of the adoption of the resolution unless one percent or more of the voters living within the territory to be annexed have at or prior to hearing filed written objections to the annexation. If written objections to the proposed annexation are made by the number of voters specified in this section, the annexation shall not be effective until it is approved by a majority vote of the voters of the territory proposed to be annexed. The election shall be conducted substantially as provided in Sections 1179, 1180, and 1181.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.

The declaration of the result and recordation of the statement of the election shall be carried out substantially pursuant to Sections 1182 and 1183 of this chapter except that the words “formation of the district” shall be replaced in each instance by the words “annexation of the new territory.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.

Territory forming a part of any existing district at the time of presentation of a petition for annexation, shall not be annexed pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. County and City Buildings [1260. - 1266.]

1260.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates:

(a) “Political subdivision” means any city, county, district, or other local governmental agency.

(b) “Governing body” means the board of supervisors in the case of a county, or the city council or board of trustees or other governing board in the case of a city, district, or other local governmental agency.

(c) “Veterans association” or “veterans service organization” means any association or organization which is composed solely of persons who served honorably in time of war or in time
 of peace in a campaign or expedition for service in which a medal has been authorized by the government of the United States, as members of the Armed Forces of the United States, or who as citizens of the United States served honorably in time of war as members of the armed forces of any nation whose government was allied with the United States during that war, and which is organized for patriotic, fraternal, and benevolent objects.

(d) “Nonprofit veteran service agency” shall have the meaning given in Section 999.51 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 697, Sec. 1.   (SB 725)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

Any political subdivision may lease any lot or building or part thereof belonging to it and not required for public use, for not exceeding 20 years, or may acquire and lease or sublease any lot or building or part thereof for not exceeding 20 years, to a veterans association, veterans service organization, or nonprofit veteran service agency organized in such political subdivision, to be used for the purposes of the veterans association, veterans service organization, or nonprofit veteran service agency. The rental shall be fixed by the governing body of the political subdivisions, and may be nominal in amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 697, Sec. 2.   (SB 725)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

Any county may provide, maintain, or provide and maintain buildings, memorial halls, meeting places, memorial parks, or recreation centers for the use or benefit of one or more veterans associations, veterans service organizations, or nonprofit veteran service agencies.
 For these purposes the board of supervisors of any county may:

(a) Purchase, receive by donation, condemn, lease, or acquire real or personal property necessary for such buildings, memorial parks, or recreation centers, and improve, preserve, manage, and control the same.

(b) Purchase, construct, lease, furnish, or repair such buildings, and provide custodians, employees, attendants, and supplies for the proper maintenance thereof.

(c) Clear, grade, plant, irrigate, fence, and improve such memorial parks, or recreation centers, and provide custodians, employees, attendants, and supplies for the proper maintenance thereof.

(d) Furnish sites
 for such buildings to be built by or for such organizations, and furnish sites for the erection thereon of such buildings, the funds for which shall be supplied by county authorities or from other sources. Any part or portion of any public lot, block, or park may be used for such purpose.

(e) Levy a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and spend the proceeds for the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Establish a fund for the purposes hereof, and transfer from the General Fund to such fund such moneys as the board deems necessary.

(g) Incur, in the manner provided by law, a bonded indebtedness on behalf of the county
 for any of the purposes hereof.

(h) Join with any incorporated city in the county in the accomplishment of the above purposes and to that end hold jointly with such city all property acquired, and expend money in conjunction with such city in accomplishing the above purposes. Title to any property jointly so acquired by a county and a city may at any time be conveyed by either of the joint owners to the other without consideration other than to carry out the purposes of this section.

(i) Join with memorial districts in the purchase, acquisition, or construction of memorial halls, assembly halls, buildings, or meeting places, or in the accomplishment of any other purpose for which a memorial district has been organized, using the funds authorized to be raised by this section. Title
 to any property so purchased, acquired, or constructed may be taken in the name of the memorial district or jointly with the county, or the county may convey any property so acquired, purchased, or constructed to the memorial district without consideration to the county. The board of supervisors may transfer to a memorial district funds raised pursuant to this section to be expended by the district in furtherance of the purposes of the district under terms and conditions consistent with the purposes for which the funds were raised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   (SB 725)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.1.

Not to exceed 50 percent of any funds accumulated in, transferred from or accumulated by transfer from, the General Fund pursuant to, and for any of the purposes authorized in, Section 1262 for expenditure within an area or community may be contributed to any water district, sanitation district or other district or public agency encompassing or lying within the county for use by such district or public agency for construction or improvement of a water supply or water distribution facility or a sewage collection system or a sewage treatment facility servicing or designed to serve a community or area within such district or public agency, when it is found by a four-fifths vote of the board of supervisors to be in the best public interest and in the best interests of such community or area. The remainder of such funds so accumulated shall be expended within such community for one or more of the purposes authorized in Section 1262, and in connection therewith a plaque shall be placed and maintained in an appropriate public place commemorating veterans from and residing in the area and reciting appropriate credit for the community public facility to which such funds were contributed. The contributions authorized by this section may be made notwithstanding and independent of any other provision of law regarding or limiting county expenditures for such purpose or county contribution to such districts or agencies for expenditure for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1445.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.

Any money which is made available by the State to any political subdivision for the purposes of acquiring and constructing public buildings may be used for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1946, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 110.)
-------------------------------------------

1264.

The governing body maintaining any facilities constructed or maintained pursuant to this chapter may provide for the use of such facilities by persons or organizations other than veterans, either free of charge or for stated compensation to aid in defraying the cost of maintenance, for any purpose not inconsistent with the continued use pursuant to this chapter, when such use will not unduly interfere with the reasonable use of the facilities by a veterans association, veterans service
 organization, or nonprofit veteran service agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 697, Sec. 4.   (SB 725)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.

The board of supervisors of any county may sell real property contiguous to an existing cemetery which it acquired for the purposes of Section 1262 to the owners of a private cemetery upon terms and conditions mutually agreed upon, but which shall require the buyers to use that property exclusively for the burial of veterans or surviving spouses or domestic partners of veterans. Sections 25524 to 25537, inclusive, of the Government Code do not apply to a sale made pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 106.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1266.

(a) Whenever a city, county, or city and county has provided, maintained, or provided and maintained any building, memorial hall, meeting place, memorial park, or recreation center for the use or benefit of one or more veterans associations, veterans service organizations, or nonprofit veteran service agencies pursuant to Section 1262 or Section 37461 of the Government Code, the provision of that facility and its acceptance by the veterans associations, veterans service organizations, or nonprofit veteran service agencies constitutes a dedication of that property to a public purpose, and the city, county, or city and county may not revoke the dedication, so long as the veterans associations,
 veterans service organizations, or nonprofit veteran service agencies have not violated the terms and conditions of the dedication, unless the city, county, or city and county dedicates substitute facilities or unless the veterans associations, veterans service organizations, or nonprofit veteran service agencies have either consented to the proposed city, county, or city and county action or have abandoned use of the facilities.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), a property shall not be considered abandoned if the veterans association, veterans service organization, or nonprofit veteran service agency is required to move from the property in order for the property to undergo seismic retrofitting or remodeling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 697, Sec. 5.   (SB 725)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Capitol Park Veterans Memorials [1300. - 1303.]

1300.

There is hereby created within the State Treasury the Capitol Park Veterans Memorial Fund for the purpose of the maintenance and rehabilitation of existing memorials in the State Capitol to veterans of the United States Armed Forces and for receipt of private donations for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 101.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

The Capitol Park Veterans Memorial Fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the purpose of the maintenance and rehabilitation of existing memorials in the State Capitol to veterans of the United States Armed Forces.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.   (AB 1350)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

The Department of Veterans Affairs shall administer the Capitol Park Veterans Memorial Fund. The Department of Veterans Affairs and the Department of General Services shall work collaboratively pursuant to a memorandum of agreement to
 carry out the duties and functions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.   (AB 1350)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1303.

When administering the Capitol Park Veterans Memorial Fund, the Department of Veterans Affairs shall prioritize, in consultation with the California Veterans Board, those memorials that do not have formal support from another body, public or private, for their maintenance, including, but not limited to, the Vietnam Veterans Memorial on the grounds of the State Capitol.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.   (AB 1350)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Vandalism of Veterans’ Memorials [1318. - 1318.]

1318.

Every person who maliciously destroys, cuts, breaks, mutilates, effaces, or otherwise injures, tears down, or removes any veterans’ memorial constructed or established pursuant to this division, or constructed or established by any veterans’ association, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1260, is guilty of a crime punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or by imprisonment in a county jail for less than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 225.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement [1330. - 1338.]

1330.

(a) The Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall establish a California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Committee composed of seven members as follows:

(1) Five members appointed by the Governor.

(2) One member appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(3) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(b) The secretary shall appoint one member from the committee to serve as chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.

Members of the committee shall not receive any compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1332.

The committee may request staff support and facilities for its activities from the Department of Veterans Affairs, and the department may provide that support and be reimbursed for the cost of this support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1333.

The committee shall be responsible for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.

(a) The beautification and enhancement of an existing memorial on state grounds is hereby authorized. For the purposes of this act, “state grounds” means that property in the City of Sacramento bounded by “Ninth,” “Tenth,” “L,” and “N” Streets. The actual site for the beautification and enhancement of the memorial shall be the site of the existing memorial and surrounding ground.

(b) Funds for the beautification and enhancement of the memorial shall be provided through private contributions and through existing funds collected under the auspices of the California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Commission. The Department of Veterans Affairs may receive contributions for this purpose.

(c) If the California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Committee undertakes responsibility to construct a memorial under this chapter, it shall not begin construction until the Department of Finance has determined that sufficient private funding is available to construct, enhance, and maintain the memorial, and the committee signs a maintenance agreement with the state, as created under subdivision (f) of Section 1335.5, to maintain the memorial with private contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1335.

With respect to the design and construction of an enhanced memorial, the committee may do all of the following:

(a) Establish a schedule for the design, construction, and dedication of the enhanced memorial.

(b) Implement procedures to solicit designs for beautifying and enhancing the memorial and devise a selection process for the choice of the design.

(c) Select individuals or organizations to provide fundraising services and to construct the enhanced memorial.

(d) Review and monitor the design and construction of the memorial and establish a program for the rededication of the memorial.

(e) Consult with the Department of General Services to determine parameters for the final size of the memorial.

(f) Consult with and obtain final design and site orientation approval from the Department of General Services and the Secretary of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1335.5.

With respect to the design and construction of an enhanced memorial, the Department of General Services, in consultation with the committee, shall seek to accomplish the following goals:

(a) Review the preliminary design plans to identify potential maintenance concerns.

(b) Compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) and other safety concerns.

(c) Review and approval of proper California Environmental Quality Act documents prepared for work at the designated state grounds.

(d) Review of final construction documents to ensure that all requirements are met.

(e) Preparation and attainment of the right-of-entry permit outlining the final area of work, final construction documents, construction plans, the contractor hired to perform the work, insurance, bonding, provisions for damage to state property, and inspection requirements.

(f) Prepare a maintenance agreement outlining the California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Committee’s responsibility for the long-term maintenance of the memorial due to aging, vandalism, or relocation.

(g) Inspect the construction performed by the contractor selected by the California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1336.

The design of the enhanced memorial shall be as politically neutral as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1221, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 1338.)
-------------------------------------------

1338.

The committee shall notify the Governor and the Secretary of Veterans Affairs when beautification and enhancement of the memorial pursuant to this chapter is complete. This chapter shall remain in effect only until, and shall be repealed on, January 1 of the year following that notification, unless a later enacted statute, which is enacted before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 7, commencing with Section 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Account [1340. - 1341.]

1340.

The California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Account is hereby created in the General Fund. All funds received by the Department of Veterans Affairs under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1330) shall be deposited in the account for the design and construction of the California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial as specified in Section 1341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 558, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1341.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all funds deposited in the California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Account established by Section 1340 are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the beautification and enhancement of an existing memorial and surrounding grounds at the State Capitol pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1330).

(b) On
 July 1, 2016, any moneys remaining in the
 California Mexican American Veterans’ Memorial Beautification and Enhancement Account shall revert to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   (SB 722)   Effective June 4, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.5. National World War II Veterans Memorial Trust Fund [1350. - 1350.]

1350.

There is hereby established the National World War II Veterans Memorial Trust Fund to receive those moneys transferred in accordance with Section 18702 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The moneys in the trust fund are hereby appropriated to the Controller for allocation to the American Battle Monuments Commission for the construction and maintenance of the World War II Memorial described in Section 1 of Chapter 864 of the Statutes of 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.6. Veterans Memorial Registry [1360. - 1361.]

1360.

The Department of Veterans Affairs shall establish a statewide Veterans Memorial Registry. The registry shall provide the location and condition of all known veterans memorials in California. The department may seek the assistance and cooperation of the Golden State Museum, State Archives, Secretary of State, Department of Information Technology, Department of Parks and Recreation, and other appropriate agencies, including agencies with expertise in historical sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1361.

The Veterans Memorial Registry shall be made available on the web site of the Department of Veterans Affairs. The department shall provide the geographically referenced information in a readily accessible format that permits members of the public to submit information on memorials to the registry, which shall be updated on a regular basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.7. Veterans Appreciation Week [1365. - 1365.]

1365.

In recognition of the efforts and sacrifices of veterans of the United States Armed Forces, the second full week in November is hereby annually designated as Veterans Appreciation Week.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Northern California Veterans Cemetery [1400. - 1403.]

1400.

(a) (1) The Department of Veterans Affairs, in voluntary cooperation with the Shasta County Board of Supervisors and the boards of supervisors of other participating northern California counties as specified in Section 1401, shall design, develop, and construct a state-owned and state-operated Northern California Veterans Cemetery which shall be located in northern California.

(2) The department shall oversee and coordinate the design, development, and construction of the cemetery.

(b) (1) Those eligible for interment in the cemetery are all honorably discharged veterans and their spouses and children. A fee of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be charged for each spouse or child interred in the cemetery.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the department shall adopt regulations to specify the eligibility requirements for interment in the cemetery.

(3) All fees received pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the Northern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund created pursuant to Section 1401.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 604, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

(a) For the purposes of Section 1400, the Shasta County Board of Supervisors may join with other northern California counties including, but not limited to, the Counties of Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Lassen, Mendocino, Modoc, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Tehama, and Trinity, to design, develop, and construct the cemetery.

(b) All moneys received for the design, development, and construction of the cemetery shall be deposited in the Northern California Veterans Cemetery Master Development Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of designing, developing, constructing, and equipping the cemetery. Moneys appropriated by the Legislature for these purposes shall also be deposited in the fund.

(c) (1) All moneys received for the maintenance of the cemetery, including moneys received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1400, shall be deposited in the Northern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Any state funding for the annual maintenance of the cemetery shall be appropriated by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(2) It is estimated that, after the construction of the cemetery, four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) should be appropriated annually by the state or the participating northern California counties, or both, to the department for the operating costs of the cemetery.

(3) Total expenditures for operations and maintenance should not be more than six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) per fiscal year, as appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 56.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

(a) Proposals for the construction, placement, or donation of monuments and memorials to the cemetery shall be subject to review by an advisory committee comprised of the cemetery administrator, representatives from the County of Shasta, local veterans’ service organizations, and others as approved by the director.

(b) All proposals for the construction, placement, or donation of monuments and memorials to the cemetery shall be subject to the approval of the director.

(c) The department shall adopt regulations for the policies and procedures to be followed with respect to the design, placement, and approval of monuments and memorials proposed to be placed on the cemetery grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 57.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the cemetery administrator, subject to the approval of the director, may accept donations of personal property, including cash or other gifts, to be used for the maintenance or beautification of the cemetery.

(b) Cash donations shall be deposited into the Northern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund and shall be expended for the maintenance and repair of the facility or, subject to the approval of the director, for a specified cemetery maintenance or beautification project designated by the donor.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, donations deposited to the credit of the Northern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund as authorized by this section shall be continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 58.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9.5. Southern California Veterans Cemetery [1410. - 1418.]

1410.

(a) (1) Pursuant to Section 1412, the department, in voluntary cooperation with local government entities in the County of Orange, shall first study and then acquire, design, develop, construct, and equip a state-owned and state-operated Southern California Veterans Cemetery, which shall be located in the County of Orange. To qualify for this paragraph, a site shall have been studied by the department and the Department of General Services.

(2) The department shall conduct an acquisition study,
 in consultation with the Department of General Services, to assess the feasibility and costs of construction of the Southern California Veterans Cemetery.

(3) The department shall oversee and coordinate the study and subsequent acquisition, design, development, and construction of the cemetery.

(4) For purposes of this chapter, “department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) (1) Subject to the eligibility requirements described in Section 2402 of Title 38 of the United States Code, as it may be amended,
 honorably discharged veterans and their spouses and eligible dependent children are eligible for interment in the cemetery. The department shall establish a fee to be charged for interment of veteran spouses and eligible dependent children. The amount of the fee shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the department for interment in the cemetery.

(2) Subject to Section 1418, for the purposes of this subdivision, the department shall adopt regulations to specify the eligibility requirements for interment in the cemetery.

(3) All fees received pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the Southern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund created pursuant to Section 1412.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 1595)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1412.

(a) For the purposes of Section 1410, all local government entities in the County of Orange may join together for the purpose of cooperating with the department in the design, development, construction, and equipment of the cemetery.

(b) (1) All moneys received for the study and subsequent acquisition, design, development, construction, and equipment of the cemetery shall be deposited in the Southern California Veterans Cemetery Master Development Fund, which is hereby created in the
 State Treasury. Expenditure of those moneys shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Moneys appropriated by the Legislature for these purposes shall also be deposited in the fund.

(2) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Southern California Veterans Cemetery Study Donation Fund. Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any local governmental entity or private organization in the County of Orange may donate moneys to the fund for the purpose of funding a study as described in paragraph (3). Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for studies consistent with paragraph (3).

(3) (A) Upon receipt of sufficient moneys to complete a study, the department may study the feasibility of a site formally proposed by
 a local government in the County of Orange for the purpose of establishing a Southern California Veterans Cemetery, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1410.

(B) Upon completion of the study, any excess funds shall be returned to the donor if requested or used to reimburse the state for expenditures made by the state for the purposes described in subdivision (a) of Section 1410.

(C) Any study conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of cost, legal, logistical, environmental, and fire hazard factors in the evaluation of the site, and an analysis of whether the proposed site meets the basic federal requirements for a federally recognized veterans cemetery.

(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1416, all moneys received for the operation and maintenance of the cemetery, including moneys received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1410, shall be deposited in the Southern California Veterans Cemetery Perpetual Maintenance Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Expenditure of those moneys shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds in the annual Budget Act to fund annual cemetery operations and maintenance and to enact any additional legislation that may be necessary to set dollar limits on funding for those operations and that maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 579, Sec. 3.   (AB 1595)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1414.

(a) Proposals for the construction, placement, or donation of monuments and memorials to the cemetery shall be subject to review by an advisory committee comprised of the cemetery administrator, representatives from local government entities within Orange County, local veterans’ service organizations, and others as approved by the secretary.

(b) All proposals for the construction, placement, or donation of monuments and memorials to the cemetery shall be subject to the final approval of the secretary.

(c) Subject to Section 1418, the department shall adopt regulations for the policies and procedures to be
 followed with respect to the construction, placement, donation, and approval of monuments and memorials proposed to be placed on the cemetery grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (AB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1416.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the cemetery administrator, subject to the approval of the secretary, may accept donations of personal property, including cash or other gifts, to be used for the preliminary or conceptual design, construction, maintenance, beautification, and repair of the cemetery, or to reimburse the state for expenditures made by the state for these purposes.

(b) Cash donations made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited into the Southern California Veterans Cemetery Donations Fund, which is hereby created.

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
 to the department for the maintenance, beautification, and repair of the cemetery or, subject to the approval of the secretary, for a specified cemetery maintenance or beautification project designated by the donor.

(2) Moneys deposited into the fund for the purpose of preliminary or conceptual design or for construction of the cemetery, or to reimburse the state for expenditures made by the state for the purposes described in subdivision (a), shall be made available only upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 89.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1418.

For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the department may adopt regulations. All regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (AB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Central Coast Veterans Cemetery [1450. - 1457.]

1450.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Endowment Fund” means the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Endowment Fund.

(c) “Nonreimbursable costs of design and construction” means the costs of planning, design, and construction of the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord that are not reimbursable from the moneys received from the State Veterans Cemetery Grant Program as allowable costs as established by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs State Veterans Cemetery Grant Program.

(d) “Operations and maintenance costs” means costs incurred by the department for the operations and maintenance of the veterans cemetery including, but not limited to, personnel costs, the opening and closing of graves, the interment of remains, committal service coordination, grounds keeping, landscaping, general maintenance, and janitorial services.

(e) “Operations Fund” means the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Operations Fund.

(f) “Phases” means the usual phases of a capital outlay project, and includes studies, preliminary plans, working drawings, including documents necessary to put the construction phase out to bid, and construction.

(g) “Veterans cemetery” means the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 694, Sec. 1.   (SB 232)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1450.1.

(a) Pursuant to this chapter, the department, in voluntary cooperation with the Board of Supervisors of the County of Monterey, the City of Seaside, the Fort Ord Reuse Authority, and surrounding counties, cities, and local agencies, shall design, develop, and construct the state-owned and state-operated veterans cemetery, which shall be located on the site of the former Fort Ord.

(b) The department shall oversee and coordinate the design, development, construction, and equipping of the veterans cemetery.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the design of the veterans cemetery closely follows the concepts published in the California Central Coast Veterans Cemetery Fort Ord Development Master Plan as prepared for the Monterey County Redevelopment Agency.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10107 of the Public Contract Code, and as authorized by Section 67679 of the Government Code, in fulfilling the requirements of subdivision (a), the department may enter into an agreement with the Fort Ord Reuse Authority for the project under subdivision (a) to be under the sole charge and direct control of the veterans cemetery public works project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.   (AB 629)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1450.2.

(a) The Secretary of the California Department of Veterans Affairs shall establish the California Central Coast Veterans Cemetery Advisory Committee that consists of the following persons appointed by the secretary:

(1) One representative from the County of Monterey, nominated by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Monterey.

(2) One representative from the City of Seaside, nominated by the City Council of the City of Seaside.
